Alabama, session 2026rs, HB635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Pursuant to Section 217(f) of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and a resolution adopted by
the Choctaw County Commission after a public hearing, the
county commission may increase the rate at which the county
levies and collects county ad valorem taxes by up to an
additional five mills on each dollar of assessed value.
(b) The proceeds of the increase shall be used
exclusively for county road and bridge improvement.
(c) Any increase proposed pursuant to this act shall be
limited to five tax years, and the proposal shall state the
amount of the levy, the date of the commencement of the levy,
and the specific road or bridge projects the increase shall
fund, including the projected completion date of each project.
(d) The county commission may submit subsequent
proposals pursuant to this act in the same manner provided in
this section.
(e) Choctaw County may become indebted and may issue
warrants to finance the construction or improvement of
specific county road or bridge projects payable from the
proceeds of any tax levied pursuant to this act.
Section 2. The increase in the rate of the tax as
Page 1

Section 2. The increase in the rate of the tax as
HB635 Enrolled
provided in this act is subject to the approval of a majority
of the qualified electors of the county who vote on the
proposed increase at the next general, primary,
constitutional, or special election held for that purpose.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB635 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 01-Apr-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3